Missouri, session 2026, SB1030.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 536.037, RSMo, is repealed and two new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 1.360
and 536.037, to read as follows:
1.360. 1. To ensure that the powers reserved to this
state under Amendment X to the Constitution of the United
States are protected and to ensure that the federal
government does not encroach on this state's status as an
independent sovereign in a federal system of governance, all
federal rules and regulations shall be subject to review.
2. No department or agency of this state shall enforce
any rule or regulation promulgated by any federal agency
within the borders of this state unless the enforcement of
such regulation is approved by the general assembly.
3. No rule or regulation promulgated on or after
August 28, 2026, by any department or agency of this state
in conjunction with the enforcement of any regulation
promulgated by any federal agency shall be enforceable
unless such rule or regulation is approved by the general
assembly.

SB 1030 2
4. Any existing rule or regulation promulgated before
August 28, 2026, by any department or agency of this state
in conjunction with the enforcement of any rule or
regulation promulgated by any federal agency that is in
force and effect after August 28, 2026, shall be subject to
review by the committee on administrative rules, established
under section 536.037. The committee shall determine
whether such rule or regulation shall continue to be
enforced and shall make a recommendation thereof to the
general assembly. The general assembly shall review all
rules and regulations referred to it by the committee and
shall approve or disapprove the continued enforcement of
such rules or regulations. No rule or regulation that the
general assembly disapproves shall be enforceable unless and
until the rule or regulation is again referred to the
general assembly by the committee on administrative rules
and then approved by the general assembly. Any rule or
regulation that the general assembly approves shall continue
to be enforced unless such rule or regulation is repealed by
the agency or department.
536.037. 1. There is established a permanent joint
committee of the general assembly to be known as the
"Committee on Administrative Rules", which shall be composed
of five members of the senate and five members of the house
of representatives. The senate members of the committee
shall be appointed by the president pro tem of the senate
and the house members by the speaker of the house. The
appointment of each member shall continue during his term of
office as a member of the general assembly unless sooner
removed. No major party shall be represented by more than
three appointed members from either house.

SB 1030 3
2. The committee on administrative rules shall meet
within ten days after its creation and organize by selecting
a chairman and a vice chairman, one of whom shall be a
member of the senate and one of whom shall be a member of
the house of representatives. A majority of the members
constitutes a quorum. Meetings of the committee may be
called at such time and place as the chairman designates.
3. The committee shall review all rules promulgated by
any state agency after January 1, 1976, except rules
promulgated by the labor and industrial labor relations
commission. In its review the committee may take such
action as it deems necessary which may include holding
hearings.
4. The committee shall review all rules and
regulations promulgated before August 28, 2026, by any
federal agency or by any state agency in conjunction with
the enforcement of any rule or regulation promulgated by any
federal agency that is in force and effect on August 28,
2026, and determine whether such rules and regulations
should continue to be enforced under section 1.360. In its
review, the committee may take such action as it deems
necessary, which may include holding hearings. The
committee shall refer all reviewed rules and regulations to
the general assembly with a recommendation of whether such
rule or regulation should be enforceable. Any citizen of
this state may request the review of any specific rule or
regulation, and the committee shall review such rule or
regulation.
5. The members of the committee shall receive no
compensation in addition to their salary as members of the
general assembly, but may receive their necessary expenses

SB 1030 4
while attending the meetings of the committee, to be paid
out of the joint contingent fund.
✓